Massachusetts, session 194th, S743.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9 of chapter 258 of the acts of 2014 is hereby amended by striking
out, in line 34, the figure “14” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 20
SECTION 2. Section 9 of chapter 258 of the acts of 2014 is hereby amended by inserting
after the word “days”, in line 34, the following words:- and will additionally provide a minimum
of 20 sessions of structured outpatient addiction programs.
SECTION 3. Section 19 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by striking out, in line 24,
the figure “14” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 20
SECTION 4. Section 19 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “days”, in line 24, the following words:- and will additionally provide a minimum of 20
sessions of structured outpatient addiction programs.
of 2

SECTION 5. Section 21 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by striking out, in line 35,
the figure “14” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 20
SECTION 6. Section 21 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “days”, in line 35, the following words:- and will additionally provide a minimum of 20
sessions of structured outpatient addiction programs.
SECTION 7. Section 23 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by striking out, in line 35,
the figure “14” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 20
SECTION 8. Section 23 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “days”, in line 35, the following words:- and will additionally provide a minimum of 20
sessions of structured outpatient addiction programs.
SECTION 9. Section 25 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by striking, in line 35, out
the figure “14” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 20
SECTION 10. Section 25 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “days”, in line 35, the following words:- and will additionally provide a minimum of 20
sessions of structured outpatient addiction programs.
SECTION 11. Section 27 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by striking out, in line
32, the figure “14” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 20
SECTION 12. Section 27 of said chapter 258 is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “days”, in line 32, the following words: and will additionally provide a minimum of 20
sessions of structured outpatient addiction programs.
of 2